Utah statutes.
17B-1-212.   Resolution indicating whether the requested service will be provided.

(1)  Within 60 days after the last hearing required under Section 17B-1-210 concerning a request, the legislative body of each county whose unincorporated area includes and the legislative body of each municipality whose boundaries include any part of the proposed local district shall adopt a resolution indicating whether the county or municipality will provide to the area of the proposed local district within its boundaries the service proposed to be provided by the proposed local district.

(2)  If the legislative body of a county or municipality fails to adopt a resolution within the time provided under Subsection (1), the county or municipal legislative body shall be considered to have declined to provide the service requested.

(3)  If the county or municipality adopts a resolution under Subsection (1) indicating that it will provide the requested service but does not, within 120 days after the adoption of that resolution, take substantial measures to provide the requested service, the county or municipal legislative body shall be considered to have declined to provide the requested service.

(4)  Each county or municipality that adopts a resolution under Subsection (1) indicating that it will provide the requested service shall diligently proceed to take all measures necessary to provide the service.

